District of Columbia statutes.
19-603.11

Application of subchapter.

This subchapter applies to registrations of securities in beneficiary form made before or after the effective date of this act [April 27, 2001], by decedents dying on or after the effective date of this act [April 27, 2001].

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 405 of the Uniform Nonprobate Transfers on Death Act (1991 Act).